District of Columbia statutes.
47-1802.02

Exempt organizations — Regulations.

The Mayor of the District of Columbia is authorized to promulgate regulations to carry out the purposes of § 47-1802.01(4), this section, and § 47-1802.03 and may amend, by regulation, the appropriate provisions of Title 16 of the District of Columbia Rules and Regulations.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-147, § 3, 25 DCR 6987
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
Delegation of authority pursuant to Law 2-147, see Mayor’s Order 86-134, August 19, 1986.
1973 Ed., § 47-1555.
1981 Ed., § 47-1802.2.
This section is referenced in § 47-1802.03.